Virginia statutes. Title 55.1. Property and Conveyances.
Article 3. Management of Cooperatives.
§ 55.1-2145.
Insurance.

Commencing not later than the time of the first conveyance of a cooperative interest to a person other than a declarant, the association shall maintain to the extent reasonably available:

Property insurance on the common elements and units insuring against all risks of direct physical loss commonly insured against or, in the case of a conversion building, against fire and extended coverage perils. The total amount of insurance after application of any deductibles shall be not less than 80 percent of the actual cash value of the insured property at the time the insurance is purchased and at each renewal date, exclusive of land, excavations, foundations, and other items normally excluded from property policies; and

Liability insurance, including medical payments insurance, in an amount determined by the executive board but not less than any amount specified in the declaration, covering all occurrences commonly insured against for death, bodily injury, and property damage arising out of or in connection with the use, ownership, or maintenance of the common elements and units.

If the insurance described in subsection A is not reasonably available, the association shall notify all proprietary lessees by hand delivery or by United States mail, sent prepaid. The declaration may require the association to carry any other insurance, and the association may carry any other insurance it deems appropriate to protect the association or the proprietary lessees.

Insurance policies carried pursuant to subsection A must provide that:

Each proprietary lessee is an insured person under the policy with respect to liability arising out of his interest in the common elements or membership in the association;

The insurer waives its right to subrogation under the policy against any proprietary lessee or member of his household;

No act or omission by any proprietary lessee, unless acting within the scope of his authority on behalf of the association, will void the policy or be a condition to recovery under the policy; and

If, at the time of a loss under the policy, there is other insurance in the name of a proprietary lessee covering the same risk covered by the policy, the association’s policy provides primary insurance.

Any loss covered by the property policy under subdivision A 1 must be adjusted with the association, but the insurance proceeds for that loss are payable to any insurance trustee designated for that purpose, or otherwise to the association, and not to any mortgagee or beneficiary under a deed of trust. The insurance trustee or the association shall hold any insurance proceeds in trust for the association, proprietary lessees, and lien holders as their interests may appear. Subject to the provisions of subsection G, the proceeds must be disbursed first for the repair or restoration of the damaged property. The association, proprietary lessees, and lien holders are not entitled to receive payment of any portion of the proceeds unless there is a surplus of proceeds after the property has been completely repaired or restored, or the cooperative is terminated.

An insurance policy issued to the association does not prevent a proprietary lessee from obtaining insurance for his own benefit.

An insurer that has issued an insurance policy under this section shall issue certificates or memoranda of insurance to the association and, upon written request, to any proprietary lessee or holder of a security interest. The insurer issuing the policy may not cancel or refuse to renew it until 30 days after notice of the proposed cancellation or nonrenewal has been mailed to the association, each proprietary lessee, and each holder of a security interest to whom a certificate or memorandum of insurance has been issued at their respective last known address.

Any portion of the cooperative for which insurance is required under this section that is damaged or destroyed shall be repaired or replaced promptly by the association unless (i) the cooperative is terminated; (ii) repair or replacement would be illegal under any state or local health or safety statute or ordinance; or (iii) 80 percent of the proprietary lessees, including every proprietary lessee of a unit or assigned limited common element that will not be rebuilt, vote not to rebuild. The cost of repair or replacement in excess of insurance proceeds and reserves is a common expense. If the entire cooperative is not repaired or replaced, (a) the insurance proceeds attributable to the damaged common elements must be used to restore the damaged area to a condition compatible with the remainder of the cooperative and (b) except to the extent that other persons will be distributees, the insurance proceeds attributable to units and limited common elements that are not rebuilt must be distributed to the proprietary lessees of those units and the proprietary lessees of the units to which those limited common elements were allocated, or to lien holders, as their interests may appear, and the remainder of the proceeds must be distributed to all the proprietary lessees or lien holders, as their interests may appear, in proportion to the common expense liabilities of all the cooperative interests. If the proprietary lessees vote not to rebuild any unit, the allocated interests of the cooperative interest of which that unit is a part are automatically reallocated upon the vote as if the unit had been condemned under subsection A of §

55.1-2105

, and the association shall promptly prepare, execute, and record an amendment to the declaration reflecting the reallocations. Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection, §

55.1-2128

governs the distribution of insurance proceeds if the cooperative is terminated.

The provisions of this section may be varied or waived in the case of a cooperative whose units are all restricted to nonresidential use.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-470; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2146.
Assessments for common expenses.

Until the association makes a common expense assessment, the declarant shall pay all common expenses. After any assessment has been made by the association, assessments must be made at least annually, based on a budget adopted at least annually by the association.

Except for assessments under subsections C, D, E, and F, all common expenses shall be assessed against all the cooperative interests in accordance with the allocations set forth in the declaration pursuant to subsection A of §

55.1-2118

.Any past-due common expense assessment or installment bears interest at the rate established by the association not exceeding 18 percent per year.

To the extent required by the declaration:

Any common expense associated with the maintenance, repair, or replacement of a limited common element must be assessed equally against the cooperative interests for the units to which that limited common element is assigned, or in any other proportion that the declaration provides;

Any common expense or portion benefiting fewer than all of the units must be assessed exclusively against the cooperative interests for the units benefited; and

The costs of insurance must be assessed in proportion to risk, and the costs of utilities must be assessed in proportion to usage.

Assessments to pay a judgment against the association may be made only against the cooperative interests in the cooperative at the time the judgment was entered, in proportion to their common expense liabilities.

If any common expense is caused by the negligence or other misconduct of any proprietary lessee, or of his family members, tenants, or other invitees, the association may assess that expense exclusively against his cooperative interest.

Notwithstanding any other provision in this section, in any cooperative where permanent residency is, in general, restricted to individuals age 55 and over, and the primary purpose of the association is to provide services and amenities to the residents of the cooperative that are consistent with the services and amenities typically provided to residents of full service senior housing communities in the United States, the declaration may provide, or may be amended to provide by vote or agreement of proprietary lessees of cooperative interests to which at least two-thirds of the votes in the association are allocated, or any larger percentage if so specified in the declaration, that:

Common expenses may be assessed against all cooperative interests in accordance with the standards in general use from time to time among full-service senior housing communities in the United States for the purpose of fairly and equitably establishing the fees and charges imposed on their residents to pay for all common expenses of such senior housing communities, including the expenses of providing services and amenities, such standards to be determined by the executive board of the association, acting reasonably;

Common expenses may be assessed against any cooperative interest that has been created pursuant to the declaration but as to which construction of the unit appurtenant to such cooperative interest has not been completed, provided that nothing contained in this subdivision shall relieve the declarant of its obligations under subsection B of §

55.1-2138

; and

Common expenses may be assessed against any cooperative interest as to which the unit appurtenant to such cooperative interest has been completed until the unit is initially permanently occupied, provided, however, that all such cooperative interests shall pay all direct expenses of the association related to such cooperative interests and any common expenses that directly benefit such cooperative interest, in each case, determined in accordance with the provisions set forth in the declaration or the association’s bylaws, provided, however, that if neither the declaration nor the bylaws contain such provisions, then such expenses shall be paid in accordance with the allocations set forth in the declaration pursuant to subsection A of §

55.1-2118

.

If common expense liabilities are reallocated, common expense assessments and any installment not yet due shall be recalculated in accordance with the reallocated common expense liabilities.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-471; 2008, c. 627; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2147.
Annual budget; reserves for capital components.

Except to the extent provided in the declaration, the board of directors shall, prior to the commencement of the fiscal year, make available to lot owners either (i) the annual budget of the association or (ii) a summary of such annual budget.

Except to the extent otherwise provided in the declaration, the executive board shall:

Conduct at least once every five years a study to determine the necessity and amount of reserves required to repair, replace, and restore the capital components as defined in §

55.1-2100

;

Review the results of that study at least annually to determine if reserves are sufficient; and

Make any adjustments the executive board deems necessary to maintain reserves, as appropriate.

To the extent that the reserve study conducted in accordance with this section indicates a need to budget for reserves, the association budget shall include:

The current estimated replacement cost, estimated remaining life, and estimated useful life of the capital components as defined in §

55.1-2100

;

As of the beginning of the fiscal year for which the budget is prepared, the current amount of accumulated cash reserves set aside to repair, replace, or restore the capital components and the amount of the expected contribution to the reserve fund for that fiscal year;

A statement describing the procedures used for estimation and accumulation of cash reserves pursuant to this section and the extent to which the association is funding its reserve obligations consistent with the study currently in effect; and

A statement of the amount of reserves recommended in the study and the amount of current cash for replacement reserves.

History.

2005, c. 436, § 55-471.1; 2019, cc. 33, 44, 712.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, cc. 33 and 44 amended § 55-471.1 from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 2019, c. 712, the 2019 amendments have been given effect in this section by
adding subsection A; in subsection B, deleting “and unless the declaration imposes more stringent requirements” preceding “the executive board”; in subdivisions B 1 and C 1, inserting “as defined in §

55.1-2100

”; in subdivision C 3, substituting “A statement” for “A general statement” and deleting “the” preceding “estimation”; adding subdivision C 4; and making stylistic changes.

Acts 2019, cc. 33 and 44, cl. 2 provides: “That the Common Interest Community Board shall develop guidelines for the development of reserve studies for capital components, including a list of capital components that should be addressed in a reserve study.”

To conform to the recodification of Title 55 by Acts 2019, c. 712, effective October 1, 2019, the following substitution was made at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission: substituted “§

55.1-2100

” for “§ 55-426” in two places.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2148.
Remedies for nonpayment of assessments.

The association has a lien on a cooperative interest for any assessment levied against that cooperative interest or fines imposed against its owner from the time the assessment or fines become due. Unless the declaration otherwise provides, fees, charges, late charges, fines, and interest charged pursuant to subdivisions A 11 and 12 of §

55.1-2133

are enforceable as assessments under this section. If an assessment is payable in installments, the full amount of the assessment is a lien from the time the first installment becomes due. Upon nonpayment of the assessment, the proprietary lessee may be evicted in the same manner as provided by law in the case of an unlawful holdover by a commercial tenant, and the lien may be foreclosed as provided by this section. The association’s lien may be foreclosed (i) by judicial sale in like manner as a mortgage on real estate or (ii) by power of sale as provided in subsection I.

A lien under this section is prior to all other liens and encumbrances on a cooperative interest except (i) liens and encumbrances on the cooperative that the association creates, assumes, or takes subject to; (ii) any first security interest encumbering only the cooperative interest of a proprietary lessee and perfected before the date on which the assessment sought to be enforced became delinquent; and (iii) liens for real estate taxes and other governmental assessments or charges against the cooperative or the cooperative interest. The lien is also prior to the security interests described in clause (ii) to the extent of the common expense assessments based on the periodic budget adopted by the association pursuant to subsection A of §

55.1-2133

that would have become due in the absence of acceleration during the six months immediately preceding institution of an action to enforce the lien. This subsection does not affect the priority of mechanics’ or materialmen’s liens or the priority of liens for other assessments made by the association. The lien under this section is not subject to homestead or other exemptions.

Unless the declaration otherwise provides, if two or more associations have liens for assessments created at any time on the same property, those liens have equal priority.

Recording of the declaration constitutes record notice and perfection of the lien. No further recordation or filing of any claim of lien for assessment under this section is required.

A lien for unpaid assessments is extinguished unless proceedings to enforce the lien are instituted within three years after the full amount of the assessment becomes due.

This section does not prohibit actions to recover sums for which subsection A creates a lien or prohibit an association from taking a transfer in lieu of foreclosure.

A judgment in any action brought under this section shall include costs and reasonable attorney fees for the prevailing party.

Upon written request, the association shall furnish to a proprietary lessee a statement setting forth the amount of unpaid assessments against his cooperative interest. The statement shall be in recordable form. The statement shall be furnished within 10 business days after receipt of the request and is binding on the association, the executive board, and every proprietary lessee.

The association, upon nonpayment of assessments and compliance with this subsection, may sell the cooperative interest. Sale may be at a public sale or by private negotiation and at any time and place, but every aspect of the sale, including the method, advertising, time, place, and terms, must be reasonable. The association shall give to the proprietary lessee and any sublessees of the proprietary lessee reasonable written notice of the time and place of any public sale or, if a private sale is intended, of the intention of entering into a contract to sell and of the time after which a private disposition may be made. The same notice must also be sent to any other person who has a recorded interest in the cooperative interest that would be cut off by the sale, but only if the interest was on record seven weeks before the date specified in the notice as the date of any public sale or seven weeks before the date specified in the notice as the date after which a private sale may be made. The notices required by this subsection may be sent to any address reasonable in the circumstances. Sale may not be held until five weeks after the sending of the notice. The association may buy at any public sale and, if the sale is conducted by a fiduciary or other person not related to the association, at a private sale.

The proceeds of a sale under subsection I shall be applied in the following order:

The reasonable expenses of sale;

The reasonable expenses of securing possession before sale; holding, maintaining, and preparing the cooperative interest for sale, including payment of taxes and other governmental charges, premiums on hazard and liability insurance, and, to the extent provided for by agreement between the association and the proprietary lessee, reasonable attorney fees and other legal expenses incurred by the association;

Satisfaction in the order of priority of any prior claims of record;

Satisfaction of the association’s lien;

Satisfaction in the order of priority of any subordinate claim of record; and

Remittance of any excess to the proprietary lessee. Unless otherwise agreed, the proprietary lessee is liable for any deficiency.

If a cooperative interest is sold under subsection I, a good faith purchaser for value acquires the proprietary lessee’s interest in the cooperative interest free of the association’s debt that gave rise to the lien under which the sale occurred and any subordinate interest, even though the association or other person conducting the sale failed to comply with the requirements of this section. The person conducting the sale under subsection I shall execute a conveyance to the purchaser sufficient to convey the cooperative interest that states that the conveyance is executed by him, after a foreclosure by power of sale of the association’s lien and that he has power to make the sale. Signature and title or authority of the person signing the conveyance as grantor and a recital of the facts of nonpayment of the assessment and of the giving of the notices required by subsection I are sufficient proof of the facts recited and of his authority to sign. Further proof of authority is not required even though the association is named as grantee in the conveyance.

At any time before the association has disposed of the cooperative interest or entered into a contract for its disposition under the power of sale, the proprietary lessee or the holder of any subordinate security interest may cure the proprietary lessee’s default and prevent sale or other disposition by tendering the performance due under the security agreement, including any amounts due because of exercise of a right to accelerate, plus the reasonable expenses of proceeding to foreclosure incurred to the time of tender, including reasonable attorney fees of the creditor.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-472; 1990, c. 831; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2149.
Other liens affecting the cooperative.

Regardless of whether his cooperative interest is subject to the claims of the association’s creditors, no property of a proprietary lessee other than his cooperative interest is subject to those claims.

If the association receives notice of an impending foreclosure on all or any portion of the association’s real estate, the association shall promptly transmit a copy of that notice to each proprietary lessee of a unit located within the real estate to be foreclosed. Failure of the association to transmit the notice does not affect the validity of the foreclosure.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-473; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2150.
Limitation of assumption of debt and encumbrances.

Unless approved by persons entitled to cast at least 80 percent of the votes in the association, including a simple majority of the votes allocated to cooperative interests not owned by a declarant or any larger percentage the declaration specifies, (i) the association shall not assume or take subject to any debt, inclusive of any principal and interest accrued thereon, incurred in the original acquisition, development, or construction of or the conversion of the cooperative in excess of the amounts disclosed in the public offering statement pursuant to §

55.1-2155

or

55.1-2156

, nor shall the cooperative or any proprietary lessee’s interest be encumbered by a security interest for any greater amount incurred for such purposes, and (ii) the declarant shall not amend the public offering statement to change the amounts disclosed after conveyance of the first unit to a proprietary lessee. However, the amounts disclosed shall not be subject to adjustment such that the association or the proprietary lessees are subjected to the construction or market risks of the declarant.

History.

2004, c. 242, § 55-473.1; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2151.
Association records.

The association shall keep financial records sufficiently detailed to enable the association to comply with §

55.1-2161

. All financial and other records shall be made reasonably available for examination by any proprietary lessee and his authorized agents.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-474; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2152.
Association as trustee.

With respect to a third person dealing with the association in the association’s capacity as a trustee, the existence of trust powers and their proper exercise by the association may be assumed without inquiry. A third person is not bound to inquire whether the association has power to act as trustee or is properly exercising trust powers. A third person, without actual knowledge that the association is exceeding or improperly exercising its powers, is fully protected in dealing with the association as if it possessed and properly exercised the powers it purports to exercise. A third person is not bound to assure the proper application of trust assets paid or delivered to the association in its capacity as trustee.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-475; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.